apertium-cat.cat.dix
<pardef n="convi/ure__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>uríem</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uria</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uríeu</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uries</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>urien</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uria</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>urem</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uré</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ureu</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uràs</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uran</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>urà</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>squéssim</l>  <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>squés</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>squéssiu</l>  <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>squessis</l>  <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>squessin</l>  <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>squés</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>vint</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>vint</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>squérem</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>squí</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>squéreu</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>squeres</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>squeren</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>squé</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>squem</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>squem</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>viu</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>viu</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squin</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>squen</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squin</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>squen</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squi</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sca</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squi</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sca</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ure</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ure</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>víem</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>via</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>víeu</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>vies</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>vien</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>via</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squéssim</l> <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>squérem</l>  <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squés</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>squera</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squéssiu</l> <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>squéreu</l>  <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squessis</l> <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>squeres</l>  <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squessin</l> <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>squeren</l>  <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squés</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>squera</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>scudes</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>scuda</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>scuts</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>scut</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>vim</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sc</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>viu</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uen</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>squem</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squi</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sca</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>squeu</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squis</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sques</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>squin</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>squen</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="conviure">        <i>convi</i><par n="convi/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reviure">         <i>revi</i><par n="convi/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sobreviure">      <i>sobrevi</i><par n="convi/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="viure">           <i>vi</i><par n="convi/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="perviure" a="prompsit2uoc"><i>pervi</i><par n="convi/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="benviure">        <i>benvi</i><par n="convi/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="malviure">        <i>malvi</i><par n="convi/ure__vblex"/></e>
